North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12D. Environmental Review Commission.

§ 120-70.41.
Commission established.

The Environmental Review Commission is hereby established.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 4.1.

Legislative Commission on Global Climate Change.

Session Laws 2005-442, ss. 1 to 12, as amended by Session Laws 2006-73, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws 2008-81, s. 1, and as amended by Session Laws 2009-306, s. 1, provides: “Commission Established; Membership. — The Legislative Commission on Global Climate Change is hereby established. The Commission shall consist of 34 members as follows:

“(1) Nine members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

“(2) Nine members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(3) The President of Duke Power or the President’s designee.

“(4) The President of Progress Energy or the President’s designee.

“(5) The President of the North Carolina Citizens for Business and Industry or the President’s designee.

“(6) The President of the Manufacturers and Chemical Industry Council of North Carolina or the President’s designee.

“(7) The President of the North Carolina Farm Bureau Federation or the President’s designee.

“(8) The President of the North Carolina Forestry Association or the President’s designee.

“(9) The Southeast Regional Director of Environmental Defense or the Regional Director’s designee.

“(10) The Executive Director of the Southern Alliance for Clean Energy or the Executive Director’s designee.

“(11) The Executive Director of the North Carolina Coastal Federation or the Executive Director’s designee.

“(12) The Executive Director of the North Carolina Conservation Council or the Executive Director’s designee.

“(13) The Dean of the Nicholas School of the Environment and Earth Sciences, Duke University, or the Dean’s designee.

“(14) The Dean of the College of Agriculture and Life Sciences at North Carolina State University or the Dean’s designee.

“(15) The Dean of the School of Agriculture and Environmental Sciences at North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University or the Dean’s designee.

“(16) The Director of the Carolina Environmental Program at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill or the Director’s designee.

“(17) The Distinguished Research Professor (with expertise in sea level change), Department of Geology at East Carolina University.

“(18) The North Carolina State Climatologist.

“Cochairs. — The Commission shall have two cochairs, one designated by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and one designated by the Speaker of the House of Representatives from among their respective appointees. The Commission shall meet upon the call of the cochairs.

“Quorum. — A quorum of the Commission shall consist of 18 members.

“Vacancies. — Any vacancy on the Commission shall be filled by the original appointing authority.

“Purpose and Duties. — The Commission shall have the following purposes and duties:

“(1) The Commission shall conduct an in-depth examination of issues related to global climate change. This examination shall include all of the following:

“a. A review of current scientific literature on the possible natural and anthropogenic causes of global climate change.

“b. A review of actions taken by the federal government and by other states to address global warming.

“c. An examination of the emissions of greenhouse gases from within the State and the extent to which reductions in the emissions of these gases in the State, region, nation, and worldwide could be expected to affect global climate change.

“d. An evaluation of the economic opportunities for the State that may result from international, national, and State action to address global climate change and the emerging carbon market.

“e. The potential impacts of global climate change on the citizens, natural resources, and economy of the State, including agriculture, travel and tourism, recreation, coastal real estate, insurance, and other economic sectors.

“f. The costs of any action taken by the State to address global climate change on individuals, individual households, local governments, businesses, educational institutions, agricultural operations, the State government, and other institutions and economic sectors.

“g. The benefits of any action taken by or within the State or other states and at the national or international levels to address global climate change on individuals, individual households, local governments, businesses, educational institutions, agricultural operations, the State government, and other institutions and economic sectors.

“(2) If, in the course of its examination, the Commission determines that it would be appropriate and desirable for the State to establish a global warming pollutant reduction goal, the Commission may develop a recommended global warming pollutant reduction goal for the State.

“(3) In conducting its examination of global climate change, the Commission shall consider and integrate the findings and recommendations of the study of issues related to the development and implementation of standards and plans to control emissions of carbon dioxide required by Section 13 of S.L. 2002-4.

“(4) Based on its examination of global climate change, the Commission shall develop findings and recommendations, including any legislative proposals it determines to be appropriate, for consideration by the General Assembly.

“Additional Duties. — The Commission may work cooperatively with other state and national governments to organize a forum on global climate change, including its causes, impacts, challenges, and opportunities in the southeastern United States. The Commission may also work cooperatively with other State agencies with respect to the agencies’ areas of responsibilities regarding greenhouse gas emissions and climate change.

“Expenses of Members. — Members of the Commission shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel allowances in accordance with

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate.

“Staff. — Upon the prior approval of the Legislative Services Commission, the Legislative Services Officer shall assign professional staff to the Commission to aid in its work.

“Consultants. — The Commission may hire consultants to assist with the study as provided in

G.S. 120-32.02(b)

.

“Meetings. — The Commission may meet in the Legislative Building or the Legislative Office Building upon the approval of the Legislative Services Commission.

“Reports. — The Commission may submit interim reports at its discretion. The Commission shall submit a final report, including any findings and recommendations, to the 2009 General Assembly and the Environmental Review Commission on or before October 1, 2010, at which time the Commission shall terminate.

“Funding. — From funds appropriated to the General Assembly, the Legislative Services Commission shall allocate funds for the purpose of conducting the study provided for in this Part.”

Pursuant to Session Laws 2011-266, ss. 2 and 2.9, the statutory requirements of the
Legislative Commission on Global Climate Change, established by S.L. 2005-442, have been met and this body is no longer authorized to meet, provide recommendations, or operate in any capacity.

Session Laws 2006-206, ss. 3.1, 3.2, provide: “Section 3.1. There is established the Biofuels Industry Strategic Plan Work Group. The purpose of the Work Group is to develop a strategic plan for expansion of biofuels as an industry in North Carolina. The Work Group shall include representatives of the College of Agriculture and Life Sciences at North Carolina State University, the School of Agriculture and Environmental Sciences at North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, the North Carolina Biotechnology Center, and the Rural Economic Development Center, Inc. In developing this strategic plan, the Work Group shall delineate the increasing role of biotechnology in the development of biofuels and may consult with all of the following:

“(1) The Department of Administration.

“(2) The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

“(3) The Department of Commerce.

“(4) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources.

“(5) The Department of Transportation.

“(6) The University of North Carolina System.

“(7) The Community College System.

“(8) The North Carolina Solar Center at North Carolina State University.

“(9) The North Carolina Farm Bureau Federation.

“(10) The North Carolina State Grange.

“(11) The North Carolina Agribusiness Council.

“(12) The North Carolina Forestry Association.

“(13) Representatives of private industry that are engaged in biotechnology and the biofuels industry.

“(14) Any other entity that the Biofuels Industry Strategic Plan Work Group deems appropriate, particularly entities that are engaged in biotechnology and the biofuels industry.”

“Section 3.2. The Biofuels Industry Strategic Plan Work Group shall submit an interim report on the development of the strategic plan, including any preliminary findings, recommendations, and legislative proposals, to the Environmental Review Commission no later than 15 January 2007. The Biofuels Industry Strategic Plan Work Group shall submit a final report on the development of the strategic plan, including any findings, recommendations, and legislative proposals, to the Environmental Review Commission no later than 1 April 2007.”

Session Laws 2010-155, s. 5, provides: “The Environmental Review Commission may study the transfer of surface water from one river basin to another. If the Commission undertakes this study, the Commission shall specifically consider whether certificates for interbasin transfers should contain conditions that require a receiving river basin to first withdraw and transfer surface water from within its major river basin before it may withdraw and transfer surface water from another river basin. The Commission shall report the results and recommendations of this study, if any, to the 2011 General Assembly.”

Session Laws 2011-298, s. 3, provides: “The Environmental Review Commission shall review the water supply laws of the State, including the interbasin transfer laws and the laws governing the establishment and implementation of capacity use areas. The Commission shall specifically consider whether the policies underlying the interbasin transfer and capacity use area laws are consistent. The Commission may make recommendations as to how the State might better coordinate its policies on interbasin transfers, capacity use areas, and other water supply laws. The Commission shall report its findings and recommendations, if any, to the 2012 Regular Session of the 2011 General Assembly.”

Session Laws 2014-120, s. 44(a)-(c), as amended by 2015-241, s. 14.9, provides: “(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to enhance shellfish habitats within the Albemarle and Pamlico Sounds and their tributaries to benefit fisheries, water quality, and the economy. This will be achieved through the establishment of a network of oyster sanctuaries, harvestable enhancement sites, and coordinated support for the development of shellfish aquaculture. The network of oyster sanctuaries is to be named in honor of Senator Jean Preston and shall be called the ‘Senator Jean Preston Oyster Sanctuary Network’.

“(b) The Division of Marine Fisheries of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall develop a plan to construct and manage additional oyster habitats. The new sanctuaries, along with selected existing oyster sanctuaries, shall be included in the Senator Jean Preston Oyster Sanctuary Network. The plan shall include the following components:

“(1) Location and delineation of oyster sanctuaries. — The plan should include locations for sanctuary network components that minimize the impact on commercial trawling. The location of sanctuaries shall take into account connectivity to existing oyster sanctuaries and proposed oyster enhancement sites. New oyster sanctuaries shall be designed to provide hook-and-line fishing while allowing the development of complex fish habitats and brood-stock oysters that will enhance recruitment in the surrounding reefs. The plan should outline a 10-year development project to accomplish the expansion.

“(2) [Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.9.]

“(3) Enhancement of oyster habitat restoration. — The General Assembly finds that the lack of a reliable State-based supply of oyster seed and inadequate funding for cultch planting are limitations to the expansion of oyster harvesting and the restoration of wild oyster habitat in North Carolina. Therefore, the plan should include the following:

“a. Provisions and recommendations to facilitate the availability of oyster seed produced in North Carolina for wild oyster habitat restoration projects as well as oyster aquaculture and to reduce potential negative impacts from importation of non-native oyster seed.

“b. Plans , where feasible, for public-private partnerships for State-based production of viable oyster seed through the creation of one or more production hatcheries and recommendations for increased support of the existing research hatchery at UNC-Wilmington.

“c. Plans and cost estimates for an expansion of cultch planting in suitable areas of the State’s coastal waters in order to expand areas suitable for development of wild oyster habitat.

“(4) Economic relief. — The plan should consider a waiver of application fees and yearly rental fees for new shellfish leases for an established period of time to further promote and support shellfish aquaculture in North Carolina. The new leasing fee waiver program should include measures to discourage speculation and target persons with a genuine interest in starting a shellfish aquaculture business, such as a requirement that the lease be nontransferable for a five-year period.

“(5) Outreach. — The plan should include outreach and education that promotes, whenever possible, public-private partnerships utilizing the Sea Grant College Program, local colleges, and other nongovernmental organizations to (i) encourage shellfish aquaculture and provide technical assistance to broaden cost-effective technologies available to leaseholders; (ii) encourage best management practices to leaseholders; and (iii) inform fishermen and the public on the benefits provided by the Senator Jean Preston Oyster Sanctuary Network.

“(6) Monitoring. — The plan should include a monitoring plan designed to (i) determine the success of oyster reef construction and (ii) evaluate the cost benefit of the oyster sanctuary network and harvestable enhancement sites.

“(7) Funding. — The plan should include a request for appropriations sufficient for Division staff to expand oyster restoration and monitoring activities for 10 years. The plan should provide that, whenever possible, public-private partnerships are employed to meet the construction, seeding, and outreach requirements of the plan.

“(8) Recommendations. — The plan shall include recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes needed to expedite the expansion of shellfish restoration and harvesting in order to improve water quality, restore ecological habitats, provide enhanced recreational and commercial fishing opportunities, and expand the coastal economy.

“(9) No funding for sanctuaries in closed areas. - The plan shall provide that no funding or other resources shall be available in water bodies where a moratorium or other legal prohibition on shellfish leasing under Article 16 of Chapter 113 of the General Statutes is currently in effect. This subdivision does not apply to leasing moratoria imposed because the area is closed to shellfish harvesting or recommended for closure by the State Health Director due to pollution.

“(c) No later than March 1, 2016, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall report to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division regarding its implementation of this section and its recommended plan.”

Session Laws 2015-196, s. 1 provides: “The Environmental Review Commission, with the assistance of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources [now Department of Environmental Quality], shall study the aggregate uses of groundwater and surface water in or affecting the Cape Fear River Basin by all users, including, but not limited to, public water systems, industrial facilities, and agricultural operations. The study shall include all of the following elements: (i) a summary of the current and 50-year projected water-use demands along with the available water supplies for those portions of Alamance, Bladen, Brunswick, Caswell, Chatham, Columbus, Cumberland, Duplin, Durham, Guilford, Harnett, Hoke, Lee, Moore, New Hanover, Onslow, Orange, Pender, Randolph, Richmond, Robeson, Rockingham, Sampson, Scotland, and Wake counties within the Cape Fear River Basin; (ii) an evaluation of the adequacy of currently available supplies to meet the expected long-term needs for all water demands, including the identification of those areas of the basin that do not have a sustainable long-term water supply for the anticipated growth of that area; (iii) the identification of potential conflicts among the various users and recommendations for developing and enhancing coordination among users and groups of users in order to avoid or minimize those conflicts; and (iv) an enhanced review of the portions of the Cape Fear River Basin within Brunswick, New Hanover, and Pender counties addressing the increased demands on groundwater and limited surface water options in that area.

“All the information and any analytical tools, such as models, employed in the conduct of the study shall be made available electronically for public review and use on the Web site of the Department’s Division of Water Resources.

“The Environmental Review Commission may submit an interim report to the 2016 Regular Session of the 2015 General Assembly and shall submit a final report of its findings and recommendations, including any legislative proposals, to the 2017 General Assembly.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Ripening on the Vine:
North Carolina’s Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency Portfolio Standard Should Be Left Unchanged Ahead of 2012 Compliance Deadline,” see 34 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 111 (2012).

For article, “Deregulatory Cost-Benefit Analysis and Regulatory Stability,” see 68 Duke L.J. 1593 (2019).

For article, “Seeing Green: North Carolina’s Clean Energy Plan, the Social Cost of Carbon, and a Way Forward Under a Least-Cost Framework,” see 99 N.C. L. Rev. Addendum 59 (2020).

§ 120-70.42.
Membership; cochairs; vacancies; quorum.

The Environmental Review Commission shall consist of six Senators appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, six Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, who shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing officer, the Chair or a Cochair of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Environment, and Natural Resources or the equivalent committee, the Chair or a Cochair of the House of Representatives Committee on Environment and Natural Resources or the equivalent committee, the Chair or a Cochair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations — Natural and Economic Resources or the equivalent committee, and the Chair or a Cochair of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations — Natural and Economic Resources or the equivalent committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall designate one or more Senators and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate one or more Representatives to serve as cochairs.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a member of the Commission shall continue to serve for so long as the member remains a member of the General Assembly and no successor has been appointed. A member of the Commission who does not seek reelection or is not reelected to the General Assembly may complete a term of service on the Commission until the day on which a new General Assembly convenes. A member of the Commission who resigns or is removed from service in the General Assembly shall be deemed to have resigned or been removed from service on the Commission. Any vacancy that occurs on the Environmental Review Commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

A quorum of the Environmental Review Commission shall consist of seven members.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 4.1; 1989, c. 727, s. 139; 1991, c. 739, s. 5; 1997-31, s. 1; 2002-176, s. 4; 2003-340, s. 4; 2010-180, s. 2; 2011-291, s. 1.13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-180, s. 2, effective August 2, 2010, in subsection (b), substituted “shall designate one or more Senators” for “shall designate one Senator to serve as cochair” and “shall designate one or more Representatives to serve as cochairs” for “shall designate one Representative to serve as cochair.”

Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.13, effective June 24, 2011, substituted “seven members” for “nine members” in subsection (d).

§ 120-70.43.
Powers and duties.

The Environmental Review Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To evaluate actions of all boards, commissions, departments, and other agencies of the State and local governments as such actions relate to the environment or protection of the environment, including but not limited to an evaluation of:

Benefits of each program relative to costs;

Achievement of program goals;

Use of measures by which the success or failure of a program can be measured; and

Conformity with legislative intent;

To study on a continuing basis the organization of State government as it relates to the environment or to the protection of public health and the environment, including but not limited to:

Improvements in administrative structure, practices, and procedures;

Increased integration and coordination of programs and functions;

Increased efficiency in budgeting and use of resources;

Efficient administration of licensing, permitting, and grant programs;

Prompt, effective response to environmental emergencies;

Opportunities for effective citizen participation; and

Broadening of career opportunities for professional staff;

To make any recommendations it deems appropriate regarding the reorganization and consolidation of environmental regulatory agencies and the recodification of statutes relating to the environment, including but not limited to:

Ways in which agencies may operate more efficiently and economically;

Ways in which agencies can provide better services to the State and to the people; and

Instances in which functions of agencies are duplicative, overlapping, incomplete in scope or coverage, fail to accomplish legislative objectives, or for any other reason should be redefined or redistributed;

To review and evaluate changes in federal law and regulations, relevant court decisions, and changes in technology affecting the environment or protection of the environment;

To review existing and proposed State law and rules affecting the environment or protection of the environment and to determine whether any modification of law or rules is in the public interest;

To make reports and recommendations, including draft legislation, to the General Assembly from time to time as to any matter relating to the powers and duties set out in this section; and

To undertake such additional studies as it deems appropriate or as may from time to time be requested by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, either house of the General Assembly, the Legislative Research Commission, or the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and to make such reports and recommendations to the General Assembly regarding such studies as it deems appropriate; provided that the Environmental Review Commission shall not undertake any study which the General Assembly has assigned to another legislative commission or committee.

The Environmental Review Commission may continue the study of environmental agency consolidation and reorganization. The study of environmental agency consolidation shall include, but is not limited to:

Monitoring the implementation of Session Laws 1989, c. 727;

Evaluation of the organization, programs, and operation of the Department of Environmental Quality;

Evaluation of the organization, functions, powers, and duties of the components of the Department of Environmental Quality, including boards, commissions, councils, and regional offices; and

Recodification of the General Statutes relating to the environment and environmental agencies.

In addition to its general powers and duties, the Environmental Review Commission shall have the following powers and duties with respect to hazardous waste management:

To study the current and projected need for hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal capacity in the State in light of anticipated generation of hazardous waste and alternatives for hazardous waste treatment and disposal;

To evaluate the potential for the development of additional hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal capacity by the private sector;

To study the necessity for and scope of hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities which are sited, owned, or operated by the State;

To review progress in securing a volunteer county to host a hazardous waste treatment facility;

To study incentives and compensation for the community which hosts, either voluntarily or involuntarily, a hazardous waste treatment facility, including any additional incentives and compensation which may be needed, whether there should be differential compensation for a volunteer county, options for use of funds by local governments, distribution of compensation among local governments, and methods of providing flexibility in the development of an incentives and compensation package for a particular local community;

To review progress in developing interstate agreements for the treatment, storage, and disposal of hazardous waste;

To assist in the development of cooperative, comprehensive regional approach to hazardous waste treatment and disposal;(8), (9) Repealed by Session Laws 2001-474, s. 12, effective November 29, 2001.

(10)

To study the capacity assurance requirement under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, Pub. L. No. 96-510, 94 Stat. 2767, 42 U.S.C. 9601 et seq., as amended, and the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, Pub. L. No. 99-499, 100 Stat. 1613, as amended as it relates to the continued eligibility of North Carolina for remedial actions under Superfund;

(11)

To study alternatives available to the State for dealing with hazardous waste and the ramifications of those alternatives; and

(12)

To receive and evaluate reports of every State agency, board, and commission which has any power or duty with respect to hazardous waste management.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 4.1; 1989, c. 168, s. 46(b); c. 727, s. 225(a); 1991, c. 739, s. 6; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 990, s. 4; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2001-474, s. 12; 2011-266, s. 1.31(b); 2011-291, s. 2.31; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.31(b), effective July 1, 2011, in subdivision (a)(7), deleted “or the Joint Select Committee on Low-Level Radioactive Waste” following “Joint Legislative Utility Review Committee” and made a related grammatical change.

Session Laws 2011-291, s. 2.31, effective June 24, 2011, in subdivision (a)(7), deleted “the Joint Legislative Utility Review Committee, or the Joint Select Committee on Low-Level Radioactive Waste” following “Commission on Governmental Operations” and made a related stylistic change.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivisions (b)(2) and (b)(3).

§ 120-70.44.
Additional powers.

The Environmental Review Commission, while in the discharge of official duties, may exercise all the powers provided for under the provisions of

G.S. 120-19

, and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

. The Environmental Review Commission may meet at any time upon the call of either cochairman, whether or not the General Assembly is in session. The Environmental Review Commission may meet in the Legislative Building or the Legislative Office Building upon the approval of the Legislative Services Commission.

Notwithstanding any rule or resolution to the contrary, proposed legislation to implement any recommendation of the Environmental Review Commission regarding any study the Environmental Review Commission is authorized to undertake or any report authorized or required to be made by or to the Environmental Review Commission may be introduced and considered during any session of the General Assembly.

The Commission may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 4.1; 1989, c. 784, s. 5; 2006-255, s. 3.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-255, s. 3.1, effective August 23, 2006, added the subsection (a) and (b) designations to the previously undesignated paragraphs; and added subsection (c).

§ 120-70.45.
Compensation and expenses of members.

Members of the Environmental Review Commission shall receive subsistence and travel expenses at the rates set forth in

G.S. 120-3.1

.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 4.1.

§ 120-70.46.
Staffing.

The Legislative Services Officer shall assign as staff to the Environmental Review Commission professional employees of the General Assembly, as approved by the Legislative Services Commission. Clerical staff shall be assigned to the Environmental Review Commission through the offices of the Directors of the Legislative Assistants of the Senate and House of Representatives. The expenses of employment of clerical staff shall be borne by the Environmental Review Commission.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 4.1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 8(f); 2007-495, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-495, s. 12, effective August 30, 2007, substituted “Directors of Legislative Assistants of the Senate and House of Representatives” for “Supervisor of Clerks of the Senate and Supervisor of Clerks of the House of Representatives” in the next-to-last sentence.

§ 120-70.47.
Funding.

From funds available to the General Assembly, the Legislative Services Commission shall allocate monies to fund the work of the Environmental Review Commission.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 4.1.

§§ 120-70.48,
120-70.49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.